Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2886YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 507 Section 1. Section 1C.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. Election Day, the first Tuesday after 3 the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year. 4 Sec. 2. Section 1C.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by 5 adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0f. Election Day, the first Tuesday after 7 the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year. 8 Sec. 3. Section 49.57, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. They shall include a unique code 11 or other identifier to distinguish genuine ballots from 12 counterfeit ballots. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 13 the contrary, a ballot that does not include a unique code or 14 other identifier that has not been previously included on a 15 cast ballot shall not be counted. 16 Sec. 4. Section 53.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 1. Any registered voter may, subject to the provisions of 19 this chapter , vote at any election: 20 a. When the voter expects to will be absent on election day 21 during the time the polls are open from the precinct in which 22 the voter is a registered voter due to a responsibility related 23 to the personâs employment . 24 b. When, through illness , age, or physical disability, the 25 voter expects to will be prevented from going to the polls and 26 voting on election day. 27 c. When the voter expects to be unable to go to the polls 28 and vote on election day because the voter is a member of the 29 military . 30 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 68A.507 Contributions from 31 out-of-state sources ââ limitations. 32 1. A candidate or candidateâs committee shall not accept 33 contributions of greater than one dollar from a person not 34 living in or incorporated or organized under the laws of this 35 -1- LSB 2886YH (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 507 state. 1 2. The general assembly recognizes that persons who are not 2 residents of Iowa have the right to free speech under the first 3 amendment to the Constitution of the United States and may have 4 a passing interest in elections in this state. However, the 5 general assembly finds that it is in the best interest of the 6 residents of Iowa for elections in this state to be influenced 7 and funded by residents of Iowa. 8 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 68A.508 Contribution limits for 9 candidates. 10 1. For the purposes of this section, âelection campaign 11 cycleâ means the time period between elections for a particular 12 office. Each primary, general, and special election is a 13 separate election campaign cycle. Separate contribution limits 14 for each type of election for a particular office, including 15 primary, general, and special elections, apply in an election 16 campaign cycle. 17 2. A person shall not make, and a candidate, candidateâs 18 committee, or anyone acting on behalf of any candidate or 19 candidateâs committee shall not accept, any contribution which 20 will cause the total amount of the personâs contributions to 21 a candidate or candidateâs committee to exceed one hundred 22 dollars. 23 3. This section applies to candidates for any public office 24 in this state. 25